Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 350.335 is amended to read:
350.335. As used in ORS 350.335 to 350.346:
(1) “Certified advocate” and “qualified victim services program” have the meanings  given those
terms in ORS 40.264.
(2) “Institution of higher education” has the meaning given that term in ORS 350.330.
(3) “Reporting party” means a student or employee  at an institution of higher education who
reports having experienced an incident of sexual misconduct to the institution.
(4) “Sexual misconduct”  means an incident of sexual harassment, sexual violence, intimate
partner violence, domestic violence, sexual exploitation,  stalking, harassment or violence based on
sexual orientation or gender identity or expression, or other gender-based harassment or violence.
(5) “Student” means an individual who:
(a) Is enrolled [ or who  is seeking to enroll ] in a credit-bearing program at an institution of higher
education, whether part-time[ ,] or  full-time [ or as an extension student ]; or
(b) Who has taken a leave of absence within the past two academic years  or withdrawn from
the institution of higher education after  reporting an incident of sexual misconduct to the Title IX
coordinator at the institution.
(6) “Trauma-informed response” means a response involving an  understanding of the complexi-
ties of intimate partner violence, domestic violence, sexual  assault and stalking through training
centered on the neurobiological impact of trauma, the influence of societal myths and  stereotypes
surrounding the causes and impacts of sexual assault and related  trauma[ , an  understanding of
perpetration methodology ] and knowledge of how to conduct an effective investigation.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 350.337 is amended to read:
350.337. (1) At least  once every two years, the Sexual Misconduct Survey Council established
under ORS 350.336 shall:
(a) Develop a base survey for distribution to institutions of higher education; and
(b) Provide each institution of higher education with  any recommendations regarding use of the
survey, including but not limited to additional content that could  be added, the timing for conduct-
ing the survey,  recommendations for achieving statistically valid response rates and how the survey
results should be interpreted.
Enrolled House Bill 4164 (HB 4164-A) Page 1
(2) In developing the base survey required under subsection (1) of this section, the council  shall:
(a) Utilize best practices  from peer-reviewed research and consult with individuals with exper-
tise in the development and use  of sexual misconduct climate surveys by post-secondary institutions
of education;
(b) Review sexual misconduct climate surveys that have been developed and previously used  by
post-secondary institutions of education;
(c) Provide opportunities for written comment from organizations that  work directly with vic-
tims of sexual  misconduct in order to ensure the adequacy and appropriateness of the proposed
content;
(d) Consult with institutions of higher education on strategies for optimizing  the effectiveness
of the survey;
(e) Account for the diverse needs and differences of institutions of higher education;
(f) Provide opportunities  for student feedback through optional comment boxes at the end of the
survey and by providing a time and space for students to comment to the council on  what could be
done to  improve the sexual misconduct climate survey described in ORS 350.338 so that the results
of the survey convey an accurate representation of happenings on campus; and
(g) Use a trauma-informed framework.
(3) The base survey shall gather data on topics including but not limited to:
(a) The number and type of incidents, both reported and unreported, of  sexual misconduct at the
institution of higher education;
(b) When incidents of sexual misconduct occurred, without requiring a specific date or time;
(c) Whether  incidents of sexual misconduct occurred on campus, off campus, overseas or virtu-
ally;
(d) If the sexual misconduct was perpetrated by a student, faculty member, nonfaculty  staff
member, third-party vendor to the institution of higher education or other individual;
(e) How aware students  are of institutional policies and procedures related to campus sexual
misconduct;
(f) Whether a student reported sexual misconduct, with specific follow-up questions regarding:
(A) For students who reported sexual misconduct, whether the report was made  to a campus
resource or law enforcement agency; and
(B) For students who did not report sexual misconduct, why the student chose not to make a
report;
(g) Whether students who experienced  sexual misconduct disclosed the sexual misconduct to a
friend, peer, family  member, faculty or nonfaculty staff member, campus resource or law enforcement
official;
(h) For a student who reported sexual misconduct:
(A) Whether the student was informed of or referred to local, state, campus or  other resources,
or to victim support services, including but not limited to appropriate medical  care, mental health
counseling and legal services; and
(B) Whether the student was provided with protection  from retaliation, access to institution-
based supportive measures or institution-based accommodations and criminal justice remedies;
(i) For a student who  experienced assault, the types of contextual factors that were present
during the assault, including but not limited to the involvement of force, incapacitation, coercion,
drugs or alcohol;
(j) Demographic information that could  be used to identify at-risk groups, including but not
limited to sex, race, ethnicity, national  origin, economic status, disability status, gender identity,
immigration status and sexual orientation;
(k) Perceptions of campus safety among members of the campus community;
(L) Student confidence in the institution’s ability to protect against and respond to incidents  of
sexual misconduct;
(m) Whether students who reported sexual misconduct took a leave of absence from the insti-
tution, or considered transferring to another institution or withdrawing;
Enrolled House Bill 4164 (HB 4164-A) Page 2
(n) Whether students who experienced sexual misconduct withdrew from any classes  or were
placed on academic probation;
(o) Whether students  experienced any financial impacts from sexual misconduct or the
institution’s response to a report of sexual misconduct;
(p) Whether students experienced  any negative health impacts from sexual misconduct or the
institution’s response to a report of sexual  misconduct, including but not limited to post-traumatic
stress disorder, anxiety, depression, chronic pain or eating disorders;
(q) Community attitudes towards sexual  misconduct, including but not limited to students’ will-
ingness to intervene as bystanders; and
(r) Any other questions the council determines would be beneficial.
(4) A base survey developed under this section:
(a) Shall:
(A) Include a “decline to state” and “not applicable” option for each question;
(B) Be offered  to all students enrolled at the institution of higher education, including students
who are [ on a leave of absence or ] studying abroad  or  who have been enrolled at the institution
within the last academic year ;
(C) Be created taking into account all reasonable measures  to ensure that an adequate, random
and representative sample of students complete the survey; and
(D) Be administered online, with reasonable accommodations provided to all students  in order
to ensure accessibility; and
(b) May not require the disclosure of any personally identifiable information.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 350.340 is amended to read:
350.340. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  each institution of higher
education shall employ at least one certified advocate as part of  a institution-based qualified victim
services  program.
[(b) An  institution of higher education is not required to employ a certified advocate if the institu-
tion:]
[(A)(i) Does not have an institution-based qualified victim services program; or ]
[(ii) Has fewer than 1,000 enrolled students who reside on campus; and ]
[(B)(i) Partners with a local victim advocacy organization to provide a certified advocate; ]
[(ii) Ensures that the certified advocate has on-campus office hours; and ]
[(iii) Ensures that the services of the certified advocate are provided without charge  to enrolled
students.]
(b) An institution of higher education  is not required to employ a certified advocate if the
institution does not have an institution-based qualified  victim services program, or has fewer
than 1,000 enrolled students who reside on campus and either:
(A)(i) Partners with a local victim advocacy organization to provide a certified advocate;
(ii) Ensures that the certified advocate has on-campus office hours; and
(iii) Ensures that the services  of the certified advocate are provided without charge to
enrolled students; or
(B) Obtains a waiver from the Higher Education Coordinating Commission. The com-
mission may waive the  requirements of this section if the commission determines that, de-
spite reasonable efforts, the institution was unable to  enter into a partnership with a local
victim advocacy organization. A waiver under this subparagraph shall be  no longer than one
year in duration, except that an institution may subsequently apply for a waiver renewal.
(2) A certified  advocate employed by an institution of higher education under this section shall
be appointed based on the individual’s experience and demonstrated ability to  effectively provide
victim services related to sexual misconduct and:
(a) May not:
(A) Be [ a] an undergraduate student of the institution;
(B) Be a Title IX coordinator for the institution;
(C) Be an authorized administrator of disciplinary processes on behalf of the institution;
Enrolled House Bill 4164 (HB 4164-A) Page 3
(D) Be a member of campus police or law enforcement; or
(E) Have any additional job responsibilities that  could create a conflict of interest, including but
not limited to being a general counsel, director of athletics, dean of students, clergy  member, or any
employee who serves on a judicial or hearing board or to whom an  appeal regarding an allegation
of sexual misconduct may be made; and
(b) Shall receive training:
(A) Required to be a certified advocate;
(B) On the requirements of Title IX of the Education Amendments Act of  1972, 20 U.S.C. 1681
to 1688, as amended;
(C) On the policies of the institution of higher education relating to sexual misconduct; and
(D) On trauma-informed response.
(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a certified advocate  who is employed full-time under
this section from receiving employment benefits, including tuition benefits.
[(3)] (4) A certified advocate who is employed under this section shall:
(a) Provide  confidential services to students and inform students of all information required to
be provided under ORS 350.330 and 350.331;
(b) Provide  written notification to all institution staff involved in providing or enforcing sup-
portive measures or accommodations of the respective duties of these staff members;
(c) If directed  by a student, assist the student in contacting campus police or local law
enforcement agencies to make a report;
(d) Notify students of their rights, and the responsibilities of the institution, regarding  pro-
tection orders, no contact orders and any other lawful [ ordered] order issued by the institution  or
by a criminal, civil or tribal court;
(e) Be subject to privilege as a certified advocate under ORS 40.264;
(f) Coordinate with on-campus sexual misconduct response  resources and any community-based
domestic  and  sexual violence advocacy agency with which the institution has entered into a memo-
randum of  understanding under ORS 350.341 within a reasonable time after being designated as a
certified advocate; and
(g) If requested  by signed written consent from a student, assist the student with coordinating
on-campus supports and supports available with any community-based domestic  and sexual violence
advocacy  agency  with which the institution has entered into a memorandum of understanding under
ORS 350.341.
[(4)] (5) A certified advocate employed under this section:
(a) If requested by a student,  may attend an administrative or institution-based adjudication
proceeding as the advocate or support person for the student;
(b) May not:
(A) Be required to report an  incident to the institution or a law enforcement agency unless
otherwise required to do so by state or federal law;
(B) Disclose confidential  information, including but not limited to the name, contact information
or any  personally identifiable information of a student or any information on the sexual misconduct,
without the prior written consent of the student  who provided the information to the certified ad-
vocate;
(C) Provide services to both the reporting party and the responding party of  the same sexual
misconduct incident; or
(D) Act as a counselor or therapist.
[(5)] (6) Nothing in this section may be construed to limit  either party’s right of cross exam-
ination of the certified advocate in a criminal or civil proceeding if  the advocate testifies after
written consent has been given.
[(6)] (7) Providing notice to a certified advocate of an alleged act of sexual misconduct or an
advocate’s performance of a service under this section may not be considered actual  or constructive
notice to the institution of higher education of the alleged act.
Enrolled House Bill 4164 (HB 4164-A) Page 4
[(7)] (8) If a conflict of interest arises  for an institution of higher education in which a certified
advocate is advocating for a  student’s need for sexual misconduct crisis services or for campus re-
sources or law enforcement services, the institution may not discipline, penalize or otherwise retal-
iate against the certified advocate for representing the interest of the reporting party.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 350.341 is amended to read:
350.341. (1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each institution of higher edu-
cation shall enter into and maintain a memorandum of understanding with a community-based  do-
mestic and sexual violence advocacy agency that is in the same county as the institution.
(2) The memorandum of understanding entered into  under this section shall ensure that the
community-based domestic and sexual violence advocacy agency will:
(a) Assist in developing the institution’s [ policies, programming and ] training regarding sexual
misconduct that involves students and employees;
(b) Provide an  accessible off-campus alternative where students and employees of the institution
can receive free and confidential sexual misconduct  crisis services, including but not limited to ac-
cess to a sexual assault nurse examiner, if available, and to domestic violence crisis services  in re-
sponse to sexual misconduct;
(c) Ensure that a student or employee of the institution can access free and confidential  coun-
seling and advocacy services either on campus or off campus; and
(d) Ensure  cooperation and training between the institution and the community-based domestic
and sexual violence advocacy agency  to ensure an understanding of the roles that the institution
or center should play in responding to reports and  disclosures of sexual misconduct against students
and employees  of the institution and the institution’s protocols for providing support and services
to students and employees who have been the victims of sexual misconduct.
(3)(a) A memorandum of understanding entered into under this section  may include an agree-
ment, including a fee structure, between the  community-based domestic and sexual violence advo-
cacy agency and the institution of higher education for the provision of confidential victim services.
(b) As used in  this subsection, “confidential victim services” means case consultation and
training fees for certified  advocates, consultation fees for the development and implementation of
student education and prevention programs, the  development of staff training and prevention cur-
riculum and  confidential on-site office space for a representative from a community-based domestic
and sexual violence advocacy agency to meet with students or  employees of the institution of higher
education.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Upon written application by an institution of higher  education,  the Higher Education
Coordinating Commission may waive  the requirements of this section if the commission determines
that, despite reasonable efforts, [ an institution of higher education ] the institution  was unable to
enter into a memorandum of understanding with a  community-based domestic and sexual violence
advocacy agency.  A waiver under this paragraph shall be no longer than one year in duration,
but an institution may subsequently apply for a waiver renewal.
(b) This section does not apply to a  satellite campus or branch campus of an institution of
higher education if the satellite campus or branch  campus has 1,000 or fewer enrolled students who
reside on campus.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 350.343 is amended to read:
350.343. (1) In addition to any requirements set forth in ORS 350.330 and 350.331, each institu-
tion of higher education shall:
(a) Receive guidance from the Title IX coordinator of the institution, local law enforcement, vi-
olence prevention specialists, public health specialists, other  individuals with experience identifying
protective  and  risk factors related to violence and the community-based domestic and sexual vi-
olence advocacy agency with which the institution entered into  a memorandum of understanding
under ORS 350.341; and
Enrolled House Bill 4164 (HB 4164-A) Page 5
(b) Use the guidance received under paragraph  (a) of this subsection to establish a trauma-
informed, gender-inclusive  sexual misconduct primary prevention and awareness training that must
be attended annually by each student and employee of the institution.
(2) Trainings provided under this section:
(a) Must be accessible to individuals with a disability;
(b) Must be culturally responsive and address the unique experiences and  challenges faced by
students based on race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion,  economic status, disability status,
immigration status, sexual orientation, gender identity and pregnancy or parenting status; and
(c) Must include:
(A) An explanation of consent as it applies to sexual activity and sexual relationships;
(B) The role drugs and alcohol play in an individual’s ability to consent;
(C) Information on options relating  to the reporting of an incident of sexual misconduct, the
effects of each option presented and the methods to report  an incident of sexual misconduct, in-
cluding confidential and anonymous disclosure;
(D) Information on the institution’s procedures  for resolving sexual misconduct reports and the
range of sanctions or penalties the institution may impose on  students and employees responsible
for a violation;
(E) The  [ name, contact information and role of the certified advocate employed by the institution ]
contact information for the office charged with  handling complaints and the name, contact
information and role of each certified advocate employed by the institution,  and information
on how to reach a certified advocate confidentially ;
(F) Strategies for bystander intervention and risk reduction; and
(G) Opportunities for ongoing sexual misconduct prevention and awareness training  and pro-
gramming.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 350.335 (5), as used  in this section, “student” means an individual who
is enrolled at least half-time in an academic credit-bearing program at an  institution of higher edu-
cation.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 350.344 is amended to read:
350.344. (1) Each institution of higher education shall waive any requirements  relating to a
minimum required grade point average or disciplinary record requirements required to demonstrate
academic success that are part of  an institution-sponsored program or activity identified by the in-
stitution under subsection (2) of this section for any participant who:
(a) Has experienced sexual misconduct  while enrolled at the institution ; and
(b) Has received a waiver in the manner described in subsection (3) of this section.
(2)(a) Each institution  of higher education shall identify the institution-sponsored programs or
activities that a waiver granted under this section shall apply to.
(b) A student must obtain a separate  waiver under this section for each institution-sponsored
program or activity.
(3) A student may obtain a waiver  under this section from the certified advocate employed by
the institution[ ,] or the Title IX coordinator at the institution[ , a student  basic needs coordinator at
the institution, any law enforcement personnel at the institution,  the student’s academic advisor at the
institution or any disability resource center personnel ].
(4) Each institution of higher education shall maintain  confidentiality of all materials that con-
tain personally identifiable information for individuals who have requested a waiver under this sec-
tion unless disclosure is required specifically  for the purpose of making required accommodations
or if otherwise required by a court of law.
(5) As used in this section, “institution-sponsored program or activity” includes but  is not lim-
ited to  a scholarship provided by an institution of higher education or an institution-sponsored ac-
ademic or extracurricular activity.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 350.345 is amended to read:
350.345. (1) No later than October 1  of each year, each institution of higher education shall
submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to:
Enrolled House Bill 4164 (HB 4164-A) Page 6
(a) The Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives;
(b) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly relating to higher education;
(c) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission; and
(d) The Director of Human Services.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the report shall include:
(a) The total number of allegations of [ intimate partner violence,  domestic violence, sexual assault,
sexual harassment  and stalking ] sexual misconduct that were reported to the institution’s Title IX
coordinator by a student or employee of the institution against  another student or employee of the
institution during the previous academic year;
(b) The number of  law enforcement investigations known to have been initiated during the pre-
vious academic year in response to reports of sexual misconduct that  were brought forward by a
student or employee of the institution against another student or employee of the institution;
(c) The number of students and employees at the institution who were found  responsible during
the previous academic year for violating the institution’s policies prohibiting sexual misconduct;
(d) The number of students and employees at  the institution who during the previous academic
year, faced academic or employment disciplinary action due to having violated the institution’s pol-
icies prohibiting sexual misconduct;
(e) The number of students and employees at the institution who, during the previous academic
year, were investigated, but found not  responsible for having violated the institution’s policies pro-
hibiting sexual misconduct;
(f) The number of students at the institution who,  during the previous academic year, requested
supportive  measures;
(g) The number of supportive measures requested  by each student described in paragraph (f) of
this subsection;
(h) The number  of supportive measures granted to each student described in paragraph (f) of this
subsection; [and]
(i) The number of  students during the previous academic year who took a leave of absence,
transferred to a different institution of  higher education or withdrew from the institution of higher
education ;
(j) The  number of students or employees of the institution who reported experiencing
sexual misconduct at the institution but who declined  to participate or requested no inves-
tigation; and
(k) The number of ongoing investigations into an accusation of sexual misconduct .
(3) A report submitted by a community college operated under ORS  chapter 341 or a career
school as defined in  ORS 345.010 is not required to include the information described in subsection
(2)(i) of this section.
(4) The information provided in the report must be provided in an anonymous and  aggregate
manner that complies with all state and federal privacy laws.
SECTION 8.
 Section 13, chapter 550, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  The  Sexual Misconduct Survey Council must submit the first base survey and related
recommendations, including but not limited to recommendations on achieving statistically  valid re-
sponse rates, to each institution of higher education no later than [ January 1, 2024 ] the start of
the 2025-2026 academic year.
SECTION 9. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4164 (HB 4164-A) Page 7
Passed by House February 21, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4164 (HB 4164-A) Page 8